District of Columbia statutes.
42-1304

Change in conditions after delivery.

If information disclosed in accordance with this chapter becomes inaccurate as a result of any action, occurrence, or agreement after the delivery of the required disclosures, the resulting inaccuracy does not constitute a violation of this chapter. If at the time the disclosures are required to be made, an item of information required to be disclosed under this chapter is unknown or unavailable to the transferor, the transferor may comply with this chapter by advising a prospective purchaser of the fact that the information is unknown. The information provided to a prospective purchaser pursuant to this chapter shall be based upon the information available and actually known to the transferor.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-263, § 5, 46 DCR 2111
1981 Ed., § 45-954.